New Jersey, session 222, A2107.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Commencing January 1 next following the effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget in the Department of the Treasury and the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), that: (1)   identifies all unencumbered or unallocated State funds that are available to be appropriated in the current fiscal year to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services for the purposes of NJ FamilyCare; and (2)   evaluates the quality of care for beneficiaries across NJ FamilyCare and compiles a prioritized list of the 12 most urgent policy changes and legislative actions, along with the associated State funds necessary to implement those initiatives, that are required to address any quality of care deficiency identified in the evaluation. b.    As used in this section, NJ FamilyCare  means the program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.), which includes the Medicaid program and the Childrens Health Insurance Program. 2.    The State Treasurer and the Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.